Rhode Island statutes. Title 1 Aeronautics
Chapter 5 Permanent Noise Monitoring Act — Aircraft Operations Monitoring System

1-5-1.
Establishment and installation of aircraft operations monitoring system.

The Rhode Island airport corporation is authorized and directed to coordinate with the federal aviation administration to complete a memorandum of agreement between the Rhode Island airport corporation and the federal aviation administration (FAA) to provide for the continuing acquisition of air traffic control radar records related to the operation of civil aircraft at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport.

The Rhode Island airport corporation is authorized and directed to install an aircraft operations monitoring system (AOMS) that shall be capable of providing detailed and summary information related to the operation of aircraft at and in the vicinity of Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport. The AOMS shall be capable of plotting and displaying over area mapping the ground-projected flight tracks and related altitudes of aircraft that use the airport. The system shall be capable of displaying flight tracks of individually identified aircraft based on time and location of operation. The system shall have the capability to produce data files in both digital and hard copy format.

The AOMS shall further be capable of producing summary reports that shall, at a minimum:

Relate aircraft location data derived from air traffic control radar with individual activity events, based on time and location within the airport environs;

Produce summary reports that disclose the use of runways by type of operation (landings or takeoffs), time of day, aircraft user group, and any other groupings that may from time to time become desirable at the option of the system user; and

Disclose the activity levels by aircraft types, including, but not limited to, operations by Part 36 stage, operations by jet and propeller-powered aircraft, by air carrier or private operators, all presented by periods of time selected by the system operator.

The AOMS reports shall be capable of expansion to provide additional data relating to flight track or corridor utilization, air traffic fix usage, and other information that may become desirable as a result of noise abatement and land use compatibility planning.

The AOMS shall be procured and in effect by June 30, 1999. Provided, that if the Rhode Island airport corporation is unable to complete a memorandum of agreement with the FAA as provided for in subsection (a) of this section by June 30, 1999, and the inability is not due to inaction by the corporation, then the director of the corporation may request the general assembly to extend the June 30, 1999 date as appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 3, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 3, effective June 1, 2021.

1-5-2.
Copies of reports to government entities.

The Rhode Island airport corporation will prepare a report on a quarterly basis pertaining to the volume and quantity and flight track of air traffic at the Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport in the city of Warwick, occurring during each quarter being reported on. These reports shall be submitted on a quarterly basis in each and every calendar year to: the office of the governor; the office of the president of the senate; the office of the senate minority leader; the office of the speaker of the house; the office of the house minority leader; and the Rhode Island department of environmental management and the mayors of the cities of Warwick and Cranston.

The report will include the total number of aircraft landings and departures, by aircraft type and time of day; an analysis of the amount of total usage of the runways during the reporting period; actual deviation from approved Part 150 departure and arrival flight paths by percent, runway, airline and time; and other information as may be desirable to ensure compliance with approved noise abatement and land use compatibility plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 487, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 3, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 3, effective June 1, 2021.

1-5-3.
Biannual public hearings.

The Rhode Island airport corporation, on a biannual basis, beginning in January 2005, will present the reports provided for in §

1-5-2

to the general public at public hearings to be held within the cities of Warwick and Cranston. The Rhode Island airport corporation shall report findings based on performance standards and compliance with approved Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) Part 150 noise abatement measures.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 487, § 2.